Utah statutes.
48-3a-1304.   Merger, interest exchange, conversion, or domestication of a low-profit limited liability company.

A low-profit limited liability company may engage in a merger, interest exchange, conversion, or domestication under Part 10, Merger, Interest Exchange, Conversion, and Domestication, to the same extent as a limited liability company that is not a low-profit limited liability company.



Enacted by Chapter 412, 2013 General Session

